Nevada, session 83, AB528.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 701A.100 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
701A.100 1. The Director of the Office of Energy shall adopt
a Green Building Rating System for the purposes of determining the
eligibility of a building or other structure for a tax abatement
pursuant to NRS 701A.110. [The Director shall not alter or amend
the Green Building Rating System adopted pursuant to this section
after July 1, 2021, and the standards and ratings in effect on that
date shall remain in effect.]
2. The Green Building Rating System must include standards
and ratings equivalent to the standards and ratings provided pursuant
to the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design Green
Building Rating System or an equivalent rating system, except that
the standards adopted by the Director:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b) [and (c),] to
(e), inclusive, must not include:
(1) Any standard that has not been included in the
Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design Green Building
Rating System or the equivalent rating system for at least 2 years; or
(2) Standards for homes;
(b) Must provide reasonable exceptions based on the size of the
area occupied by the building or other structure; [and]
(c) Must require a building or other structure , except for a
building or other structure that is subject to paragraph (f), to
obtain:
(1) At least [5 points] 1 point in [the Optimize Energy
Performance] resilience credit [, or its equivalent,] to meet the
equivalent of the silver level;
(2) At least [7] 2 points in [the Optimize Energy
Performance] resilience credit [, or its equivalent,] to meet the
equivalent of the gold level; and
(3) At least [11] 3 points in [the Optimize Energy
Performance] resilience credit [, or its equivalent,] to meet the
equivalent of the platinum or zero carbon level.
(d) Must require a building or other structure, except for a
building or other structure that is subject to paragraph (e) or (f),
to have energy performance which is:
(1) At least 5 percent more efficient than the applicable
building code, to meet the equivalent of the silver level;
(2) At least 10 percent more efficient than the applicable
building code, to meet the equivalent of the gold level; and
-
*AB528*

– 4 –
(3) At least 15 percent more efficient than the applicable
building code, to meet the equivalent of the platinum level.
(e) Must require a building or other structure that qualifies for
an abatement under the Leadership in Energy and Environmental
Design “Existing Buildings: Operations and Maintenance” rating
system, or its equivalent, except for a building or structure that is
subject to paragraph (f):
(1) To qualify for the alternative deduction for energy
efficient building retrofit property described in 26 U.S.C. §
179D(f); and
(2) To achieve net zero carbon emissions, to meet the
equivalent of the zero carbon level.
(f) Must require a building or other structure that received a
partial abatement pursuant to NRS 701A.110 before July 1, 2021,
to obtain recertification under the Leadership in Energy and
Environmental Design “Existing Buildings: Operations and
Maintenance” rating system or its equivalent and:
(1) Have energy performance which meets the
requirements of the building code in the applicable jurisdiction
with respect to new buildings or structures; or
(2) Qualify for the alternative deduction for energy efficient
building retrofit property described in 26 U.S.C. § 179D(f).
(g) Must require a building or other structure which includes
connected parking to obtain:
(1) If the connected parking is a parking structure,
certification pursuant to the Parksmart Certification Standard
administered by Green Business Certification Inc. or an
equivalent certification system; or
(2) If the connected parking is a parking lot, certification
pursuant to the SITES Rating System administered by Green
Business Certification Inc. or an equivalent certification system.
3. The Director shall adopt regulations identifying the credits
provided pursuant to the Leadership in Energy and
Environmental Design Green Building Rating System or an
equivalent rating system which are deemed resilience credits for
the purposes of paragraph (c) of subsection 2. In selecting such
credits, the Director shall consider the potential benefits such
credits will have on building, site and community resilience,
including, without limitation, in reducing the heat island effect,
improving flood management and increasing indoor and outdoor
water efficiency. Such credits may include, without limitation:
(a) Energy and Atmosphere, Renewable Energy credit;
(b) Sustainable Sites, Heat Island Reduction credit;
(c) Sustainable Sites, Enhanced Resilient Site Design credit;
(d) Water Efficiency, Enhanced Water Efficiency credit;
-
*AB528*

– 5 –
(e) Water Efficiency, Water Metering and Leak Detection
credit; or
(f) Indoor Environmental Quality, Resilient Spaces credit.
4. As used in this section [, “home”] :
(a) “Connected parking” means a parking structure or
parking lot that is physically connected to and serves a building or
other structure and is owned or leased by the owner of the
building or other structure or a subsidiary of the owner. A parking
structure or parking lot may be physically connected to a building
or other structure by an elevated or ground-level walkway or
sidewalk, by an elevator or by direct entry.
(b) “Home” means a building or other structure for which the
principal use is as a residential dwelling for not more than four
families.
Sec. 2. NRS 701A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Director, in consultation with the Office of Economic Development,
shall grant a partial abatement from the portion of the taxes imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes imposed for
public education, on a building or other structure that is determined
to meet the equivalent of the silver level or higher by an
independent contractor authorized to make that determination in
accordance with the Green Building Rating System adopted by the
Director pursuant to NRS 701A.100 [,] or, in the case of a building
or other structure that received an abatement pursuant to this
section before July 1, 2021, that is recertified under the Green
Building Rating System adopted by the Director, if:
(a) [No] Except in the case of a building or other structure that
is owned by the State or a local government, no funding is
provided by any governmental entity in this State for the acquisition,
design, construction or renovation of the building or other structure
or for the acquisition of any land therefor. For the purposes of this
paragraph:
(1) Private activity bonds must not be considered funding
provided by a governmental entity.
(2) The term “private activity bond” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 26 U.S.C. § 141.
(b) The owner of the property:
(1) Submits an application for the partial abatement to the
Director . [before July 1, 2021.] If such an application is submitted
for a project that has not been completed on the date of that
submission and there is a significant change in the scope of the
project after that date, the application must be amended to include
the change or changes.
-
*AB528*

– 6 –
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
provides to the Director, within 48 months after applying for the
partial abatement, proof that the building or other structure meets
the equivalent of the silver level or higher, as determined by an
independent contractor authorized to make that determination in
accordance with the Green Building Rating System adopted by the
Director pursuant to NRS 701A.100 [.] or, the case of a building or
other structure that received an abatement pursuant to this section
before July 1, 2021, proof that the building or other structure was
recertified in accordance with the Green Building Rating System
adopted by the Director. The Director may, for good cause shown,
extend the period for providing such proof.
(3) Files a copy of each application and amended application
submitted to the Director pursuant to subparagraph (1) with the:
(I) Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of Finance;
(II) Department of Taxation;
(III) County assessor;
(IV) County treasurer;
(V) Office of Economic Development;
(VI) Board of county commissioners; and
(VII) City manager and city council, if any.
(c) The abatement is consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
2. The Director shall not approve an application for a partial
abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS
submitted pursuant to this section by the owner of the property
unless the application is approved or deemed approved by the board
of county commissioners pursuant to this subsection. The board of
county commissioners of a county must provide notice to the
Director that the board intends to consider an application and, if
such notice is given, must approve or deny the application not later
than 30 days after the board receives a copy of the application. The
board of county commissioners:
(a) Shall, in considering an application pursuant to this
subsection, make a recommendation to the Director regarding the
application;
(b) May, in considering an application pursuant to this
subsection, deny an application only if the board of county
commissioners determines, based on relevant information, that:
(1) The projected cost of the services that the local
government is required to provide to the building or other structure
for which the abatement is received will exceed the amount of tax
revenue that the local government is projected to receive as a result
of the abatement; or
-
*AB528*

– 7 –
(2) The projected financial benefits that will result to the
county from any employment resulting from the use of the building
or other structure and from capital investments by the owner of the
building or other structure in the county will not exceed the
projected loss of tax revenue that will result from the abatement; and
(c) May, without regard to whether the board has provided
notice to the Director of its intent to consider the application, make a
recommendation to the Director regarding the application.
 If the board of county commissioners does not approve or deny
the application pursuant to this subsection within 30 days after the
board receives a copy of the application, the application shall be
deemed approved.
3. As soon as practicable after the Director receives the
application and proof required by subsection 1, the Director, in
consultation with the Office of Economic Development, shall
determine whether the building or other structure is eligible for the
abatement and, if so, forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to the:
(a) Department of Taxation;
(b) County assessor;
(c) County treasurer; and
(d) Office of Economic Development.
4. The Director may, with the assistance of the Chief of the
Budget Division and the Department of Taxation, publish a fiscal
note that indicates an estimate of the fiscal impact of the partial
abatement on the State and on each affected local government. If the
Director publishes a fiscal note that estimates the fiscal impact of
the partial abatement on local government, the Director shall
forward a copy of the fiscal note to each affected local government.
As soon as practicable after receiving a copy of a certificate of
eligibility pursuant to subsection 3, the Department of Taxation
shall forward a copy of the certificate to each affected local
government.
5. The partial abatement for:
(a) A building or other structure must, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b) [,] or (c), be for a duration of not more
than 10 years and in an annual amount that equals, for a building or
other structure that meets the equivalent of:
(1) The silver level, [25] 20 percent of the portion of the
taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land;
(2) The gold level, [30] 25 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
-
*AB528*

– 8 –
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land; or
(3) The platinum level, 35 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land.
(b) A building or other structure that qualifies for an abatement
under the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design
“Existing Buildings: Operations and Maintenance” rating system, or
its equivalent, and which did not receive an abatement pursuant to
this section before July 1, 2021, must be for a duration of not more
than 5 years and in an annual amount that equals, except as
otherwise provided in subsection 6, for a building or other structure
that meets the equivalent of:
(1) The silver level, [25] 20 percent of the portion of the
taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land;
(2) The gold level, [30] 25 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land; [or]
(3) The platinum level, [35] 30 percent of the portion of the
taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land [.] ; or
(4) The zero carbon level, 35 percent of the portion of the
taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any
taxes imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed
for the building or other structure, excluding the associated land.
(c) A building or other structure that received an abatement
pursuant to this section before July 1, 2021, must be for a duration
of not more than 3 years and in an annual amount that equals,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, 5 percent of the
portion of the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS,
other than any taxes imposed for public education, that would
otherwise be owed for the building or other structure, excluding
the associated land.
6. The Director shall not grant a partial abatement of more than
$100,000 in any year for a building or other structure that qualifies
for an abatement pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 5.
7. A partial abatement granted pursuant to this section:
(a) Does not apply during any period in which the owner of the
building or other structure is receiving another abatement or
-
*AB528*

– 9 –
exemption pursuant to this chapter or NRS 361.045 to 361.159,
inclusive, from the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS.
(b) Terminates upon any determination by the Director that the
building or other structure has ceased to meet the equivalent of the
silver level or higher [.] or ceased to meet the requirements for
recertification under the Green Building Rating System adopted
by the Director, as applicable. The Director shall provide notice and
a reasonable opportunity to cure any noncompliance issues before
making a determination that the building or other structure has
ceased to meet that standard. The Director shall immediately
provide notice of each determination of termination to the:
(1) Department of Taxation, who shall immediately notify
each affected local government of the determination;
(2) County assessor;
(3) County treasurer; and
(4) Office of Economic Development.
8. If a partial abatement terminates pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 7, the owner of the property to which the partial
abatement applied shall repay to the county treasurer the amount of
the exemption that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
date of that termination. The owner shall, in addition to the amount
of the exemption required to be paid pursuant to this subsection, pay
interest on the amount due at the rate most recently established
pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the
last day of the month following the period for which the payment
would have been made had the partial abatement not been approved
until the date of payment of the tax.
9. The Director, in consultation with the Office of Economic
Development, shall adopt regulations:
(a) Establishing the qualifications and methods to determine
eligibility for and the duration of the abatement;
(b) Prescribing such forms as will ensure that all information
and other documentation necessary to make an appropriate
determination is filed with the Director; [and]
(c) Prescribing the criteria for determining when there is a
significant change in the scope of a project for the purposes of
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 [,] ;
(d) Prescribing a procedure whereby the State or a local
government, if the State or local government owns a building or
structure which is approved for an abatement pursuant to this
section, may, in exchange for compensation, assign the amount of
the abatement approved for the building or structure of the State
or local government to another building or structure in the same
county which has been approved for an abatement pursuant to this
-
*AB528*

– 10 –
section, thereby allowing the other building to claim both
abatements; and
(e) Requiring recipients of a partial abatement pursuant to this
section to submit annually to the Office, for the duration of the
partial abatement, a benchmarking report which includes the total
energy and water consumption for the building or other structure
that is subject to the abatement and such other information as the
Director may prescribe,
 and the Department of Taxation shall adopt such additional
regulations as it determines to be appropriate to carry out the
provisions of this section.
10. The Director shall:
(a) Cooperate with the Office of Economic Development in
carrying out the provisions of this section; [and]
(b) Cooperate with the Office of Economic Development to
publicize the availability of the partial abatements pursuant to this
section; and
(c) Submit to the Office of Economic Development an annual
report, at such a time [and containing such information] as the
Office may require, regarding the partial abatements granted
pursuant to this section [.] and containing:
(1) The anticipated and actual energy and water savings of
buildings and other structures receiving the abatement, both
cumulatively and disaggregated by such characteristics as the
Office may require; and
(2) Such additional information as the Office may require.
11. The Director may charge and collect a fee from each
applicant who submits an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section. The amount of the fee must not exceed the
actual cost to the Director for processing the application and
evaluating the proof submitted by the applicant pursuant to
subsection 1 and making the determination concerning eligibility for
the partial abatement required by subsection 3.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Building or other structure” does not include any building
or other structure for which the principal use is as a residential
dwelling for not more than four families.
(b) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Energy
appointed pursuant to NRS 701.150.
(c) “Taxes imposed for public education” means:
(1) Any ad valorem tax authorized or required by chapter
387 of NRS;
(2) Any ad valorem tax authorized or required by chapter
350 of NRS for the obligations of a school district, including,
-
*AB528*

– 11 –
without limitation, any ad valorem tax necessary to carry out the
provisions of subsection 5 of NRS 350.020; and
(3) Any other ad valorem tax for which the proceeds thereof
are dedicated to the public education of pupils in kindergarten
through grade 12.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing preparatory administrative tasks; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB528*